Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
602

COURTS OF
APPEAL

Part I. Supreme Court

Section

602-1 How constituted

602-2 Salary, supreme court justices

602-3 Absence, disability, etc., of chief
justice

602-4 Superintendence of inferior courts

602-5 Jurisdiction and powers; filing

602-5.5 Judiciary records

602-6 Repealed

602-7 Oaths, subpoenas

602-8 Terms

602-9 Sessions, where

602-10 Full court; oral argument; substitute
justices

602-11 Rules

602-12, 13 Repealed

602-16 Repealed

602-21 Renumbered

602-22 to 24 Repealed

602-31 to 34 Repealed

602-36, 37 Repealed

Part II. Intermediate Appellate Court

602-51 How constituted

602-52 Salary

602-53 Terms

602-54 Session, where

602-55 Panels; substitute judge

602-56 Absence, disability, of the chief judge

602-57 Jurisdiction

602-58 Application for transfer to the supreme
court

602-59 Review of decision of the intermediate
appellate

court, certiorari

602-60 Subpoenas; oaths

Note

As to procedural statutes superseded by the rules of court,
see note preceding Title 32.

Chapter and part headings amended by L 1972, c 88, §2(h); L
1979, c 111, pt of §2.

Cross References

Uniform electronic legal material act, see chapter 98.

Law Journals and Reviews

Appellate Caseload in Hawaii. 13 HBJ, no. 3, at 3 (1977).

Remarks on Alternative Proposals to Remedy Appellate Court
Congestion in Hawaii. 14 HBJ, no. 2, at 55 (1978).

An Introduction to Hawaii's New Appellate System. 15 HBJ,
no. 2, at 47 (1980).

Administering Justice or Just Administration: The Hawaii
Supreme Court and the Intermediate Court of Appeals. 14 UH L. Rev. 271 (1992).

Judicial Review and Sexual Freedom. 30 UH L. Rev. 1 (2007).

Electronic Discovery: A Call for a New Rules Regime for the
Hawai‘i Courts. 32 UH L. Rev. 153 (2009).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next